Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 14
OTHER JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS

31-10-1401. Controversies.

When any controversy arises between any official charged with any duty or function under this article and any candidate or other person, the district court, upon the filing of a verified petition by any such official or person setting forth in concise form the nature of the controversy and the relief sought, shall issue an order commanding the respondent in such petition to appear before the court and answer under oath to such petition. It is the duty of the court to summarily hear and dispose of any such issues, with a view to obtaining a substantial compliance with the provisions of this article by the parties to such controversy, and to make and enter orders and judgments and to follow the procedures of such court to enforce all such orders and judgments.

Such proceedings may be reviewed and finally adjudicated by the supreme court of this state if application to such court is made within five days after the termination thereof by the court in which the petition was filed and if the supreme court is willing to assume jurisdiction of the case.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1068, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1201 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1402. Correction of errors.

The clerk shall, on his own motion, correct without delay any error in publication or sample or official ballots which he discovers or which is brought to his attention and which can be corrected without interfering with the timely distribution of the ballots.

When it appears by verified petition of a candidate or his agent to the district court that an error or omission has occurred in the publication of the names or descriptions of the candidates or in the printing of the sample or official ballots which has not been corrected by the clerk, the court shall issue an order requiring the clerk to forthwith correct such error or to forthwith show cause why such error should not be corrected. Costs, including a reasonable attorney fee, may be taxed in the discretion of such court against either party.

Such proceedings may be reviewed and finally adjudicated by the supreme court of this state if application to such court is made within five days after the termination thereof by the court in which the petition was filed and if the supreme court is willing to assume jurisdiction of the case.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1069, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1202 as it existed prior to 1975.